Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1494.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 13.10. Over-the-Counter Availability of Ivermectin.--(a) Ivermectin suitable for human use may be dispensed, sold or purchased in this Commonwealth as an over-the-counter medication without a prescription or consultation with a pharmacist, physician or other health care practitioner.(b) As used in this section, the term "over-the-counter 12345678910111213141516171819202122 medication" means a drug that may be legally dispensed, sold and purchased without a prescription in accordance with Federal and State law.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1494PN1748 - 2 - 1234